Hawaii statutes.
§431:12-110 Premium rates. Premium
rates for insurance sold on a mass merchandising basis shall comply with the
standards in article 10C for motor vehicle insurance and in article 14 for
property and casualty insurance including the standards that rates not be
excessive, inadequate or unfairly discriminatory.

Rates shall not be deemed to be unfairly
discriminatory because different premiums result for policyholders with like
loss exposure but different expense factors, or like expense factors but different
loss exposures, so long as the rates reflect the differences with reasonable
accuracy. Rates shall not be deemed to be unfairly discriminatory if they are
averaged broadly among persons insured under a mass merchandising plan. [L
1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next